apertium-nld-0.2.0/apertium-nld.nld.dix
<pardef n="Oostzee__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Europese_Unie__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Verenigde_Naties__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Wynand__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Harry__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'s</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Anrie__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Maria__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'s</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Beatrix__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="van_der_Merwe__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Botha__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'s</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Hughes__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Wikipedia__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'s</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Apertium__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Linux__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  </pardefs>

<e lm="Barentszzee">     <i>Barentszzee</i><par n="Oostzee__np"/></e>
<e lm="Beaufortzee">     <i>Beaufortzee</i><par n="Oostzee__np"/></e>
<e lm="Europese Unie">   <i>Europese<b/>Unie</i><par n="Europese_Unie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kaspische Zee">   <i>Kaspische<b/>Zee</i><par n="Oostzee__np"/></e>
<e lm="Noordelijke Ijszee"><i>Noordelijke<b/>Ijszee</i><par n="Oostzee__np"/></e>
<e lm="Noordzee">        <i>Noordzee</i><par n="Oostzee__np"/></e>
<e lm="Noorse Zee">      <i>Noorse<b/>Zee</i><par n="Oostzee__np"/></e>
<e lm="Oost-Siberische Zee"><i>Oost-Siberische<b/>Zee</i><par n="Oostzee__np"/></e>
<e lm="Oostzee">         <i>Oostzee</i><par n="Oostzee__np"/></e>
<e lm="Verenigde Naties"><i>Verenigde<b/>Naties</i><par n="Verenigde_Naties__np"/></e>
<e lm="Zwarte Zee">      <i>Zwarte<b/>Zee</i><par n="Oostzee__np"/></e>
<e lm="Laurens">         <i>Laurens</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Richard">         <i>Richard</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Adriaan">         <i>Adriaan</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Wynand">          <i>Wynand</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hendrik">         <i>Hendrik</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="John">            <i>John</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Willem">          <i>Willem</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Robert">          <i>Robert</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Edward">          <i>Edward</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Frank">           <i>Frank</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Leonardo">        <i>Leonardo</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Frederik">        <i>Frederik</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Martin">          <i>Martin</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Joseph">          <i>Joseph</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Michael">         <i>Michael</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pieter">          <i>Pieter</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Piet">            <i>Piet</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jesus">           <i>Jesus</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Louis">           <i>Louis</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Harry">           <i>Harry</i><par n="Harry__np"/></e>
<e lm="Karel">           <i>Karel</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Abraham">         <i>Abraham</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jim">             <i>Jim</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Eduard">          <i>Eduard</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Anrie">           <i>Anrie</i><par n="Anrie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Dima">            <i>Dima</i><par n="Anrie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mieke">           <i>Mieke</i><par n="Anrie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Marieke">         <i>Marieke</i><par n="Anrie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Maria">           <i>Maria</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Marie">           <i>Marie</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mary">            <i>Mary</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hanna">           <i>Hanna</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Anne">            <i>Anne</i><par n="Anrie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Victoria">        <i>Victoria</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Elizabeth">       <i>Elizabeth</i><par n="Anrie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Beatrix">         <i>Beatrix</i><par n="Beatrix__np"/></e>
<e lm="Els">             <i>Els</i><par n="Beatrix__np"/></e>
<e lm="Wikipedia">       <i>Wikipedia</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Apertium">        <i>Apertium</i><par n="Apertium__np"/></e>
<e lm="Linux">           <i>Linux</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
<e lm="Javascript">      <i>Javascript</i><par n="Apertium__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hezbollah">       <i>Hezbollah</i><par n="Apertium__np"/></e>
<e lm="NAVO">            <i>NAVO</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Amnesty International"><i>Amnesty<b/>International</i><par n="Apertium__np"/></e>
<e lm="Botha">           <i>Botha</i><par n="Botha__np"/></e>
<e lm="Dalí">            <i>Dalí</i><par n="Botha__np"/></e>
<e lm="Fischer">         <i>Fischer</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hemingway">       <i>Hemingway</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hitler">          <i>Hitler</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="De Beauvoir">     <i>De<b/>Beauvoir</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hughes">          <i>Hughes</i><par n="Hughes__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mandela">         <i>Mandela</i><par n="Botha__np"/></e>
<e lm="Shakespeare">     <i>Shakespeare</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="Smith">           <i>Smith</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="Stalin">          <i>Stalin</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="Stellenbosch">    <i>Stellenbosch</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="van der Merwe">   <i>van<b/>der<b/>Merwe</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="van Vuuren">      <i>van<b/>Vuuren</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="Warhol">          <i>Warhol</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="Alice">           <i>Alice</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Amy">             <i>Amy</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ana">             <i>Ana</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Anca">            <i>Anca</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Angela">          <i>Angela</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ann">             <i>Ann</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Anna">            <i>Anna</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Annasusanna">     <i>Annasusanna</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Aurélie">         <i>Aurélie</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Barbara">         <i>Barbara</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Betty">           <i>Betty</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Carol">           <i>Carol</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Conchita">        <i>Conchita</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Dalida">          <i>Dalida</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kate">            <i>Kate</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Muiriel">         <i>Muiriel</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Nancy">           <i>Nancy</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Nora">            <i>Nora</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sayoko">          <i>Sayoko</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Susan">           <i>Susan</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Aisberg">         <i>Aisberg</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="Alister">         <i>Alister</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Andreescu">       <i>Andreescu</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="Anton">           <i>Anton</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Audley">          <i>Audley</i><par n="Apertium__np"/></e>
<e lm="Beethoven">       <i>Beethoven</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="Billy">           <i>Billy</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Brian">           <i>Brian</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Chopin">          <i>Chopin</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="Chris">           <i>Chris</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Christus">        <i>Christus</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Colombus">        <i>Colombus</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="Columbus">        <i>Columbus</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="Corvinus">        <i>Corvinus</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="Costa">           <i>Costa</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="Cristiano">       <i>Cristiano</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Einstein">        <i>Einstein</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="Facebook">        <i>Facebook</i><par n="Apertium__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ferris">          <i>Ferris</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="Gale">            <i>Gale</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Google">          <i>Google</i><par n="Apertium__np"/></e>
<e lm="Herzog">          <i>Herzog</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="Karlo">           <i>Karlo</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Lincoln">         <i>Lincoln</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pitt">            <i>Pitt</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ronaldo">         <i>Ronaldo</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tanaka">          <i>Tanaka</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
<e lm="Vladimir">        <i>Vladimir</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
<e lm="Zarathustra">     <i>Zarathustra</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
